Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-105
Order of business.

Whenever the Court of Impeachment in any way interferes with the business of any other court of the state, that of the Court of Impeachment shall take precedence.

Laws 1879, § 5, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 1132;

C.S.1922, § 1061;

C.S.1929, § 27-105;

R.S.1943, § 24-105.